en: Potato preparations
da: Kartoffeltilberedninger
de: Kartoffelzubereitungen
fi: Perunavalmisteet
fr: Préparations à base de pommes de terre
hr: Pripravci od krumpira
it: preparazioni a base di patate
nl: Aardappelbereidingen
pt: Preparados de batata

en: Rostis, Potatoes cakes, Potato cakes
da: Røsti, Rösti
de: Röstis
fr: Rostis, Galette de pomme de terre, Galette de pommes de terre
hr: Rostis

en: Duchesse potatoes
ca: Patates duquessa
cz: Bramborové pusinky
da: Duchesse-kartofler, Pommes duchesse
de: Herzoginkartoffeln
es: Patatas duquesa
fi: Duchesseperunat
fr: Pommes duchesses, Pomme de terre duchesse
hu: Hercegnőburgonya
it: Patate duchesse
ja: ポメ・デュセス
jv: Duchess kenthang
ko: 폼 뒤셰스
lv: Kartupelu rozites
nl: Hertoginnenaardappelen
pl: Rozetki ziemniaczne
ru: Картофельные розочки, Картофель дюшес
sv: Duchessepotatisar, Pommes duchesse
uk: Картопля Дюшес
uz: Dyushes kartoshka
vi: Khoai tây nữ Công tước

en: Hash Browns, hashed browns
ja: ハッシュポテト

en: Potato buns
da: Kartoffelboller
sv: Potatisbullar

en: Potato croquettes
sv: Potatiskroketter

en: Mashed potatoes
bg: Картофено пюре
da: Kartoffelmos
de: Kartoffelpüree, Kartoffelpürees, Kartoffelbreie, Stampfkartoffeln, Quetschkartoffeln
fi: perunamuusit
fr: Purées de pommes de terre, Purée de pommes de terre
hr: Pire krompir
it: Purè di patate
ja: マッシュポテト
nl: Aardappelpureeën
ru: Пюре картофельное, Картофельное пюре
sv: Potatismos, Kartoffelmos

en: Pure mashed potatoes, Mashed potatoes 100%
da: Ren kartoffelmos
fr: Purées de pommes de terres pures, Purées de pommes de terre 100%, purée de pommes de terre 100%

en: Mashed vegetables
de: Gestampfte Gemüse
fi: soseutetut vihannekset
fr: Purées de légumes
it: Purè di verdure
nl: Groentepureeën
ro: Zacusca

en: Mashed carrots, Carrots puree
de: Karottenbreie
fr: Purées de carottes
hr: Pasiranu mrkvu
nl: Wortelpureeën

en: Mashed zucchini, Courgettes puree
de: Zucchinibreie
fr: Purées de courgettes, Purée de courgettes
hr: Pasirane tikvice
nl: Courgettepureeën

en: Mashed broccoli, Broccoli puree
de: Brokkolibreie, Broccolibreie
fr: Purées de brocolis, Purée de brocolis
hr: Pasirana brokula
nl: Brocollipureeën

en: Mashed spinachs, Spinach puree
de: Spinatbreie
fr: Purées d'épinards
hr: Pasirani špinat
nl: Spinaziepureeën

en: Mashed cauliflower
de: Blumenkohlbreie
fr: Purées de choux-fleurs
hr: Pasiranu cvjetaču
nl: Bloemkoolpureeën

en: Frozen mashed cauliflower
fr: Purées de choux-fleurs surgelées

en: Mashed celeriac, Celeriac puree
de: Selleriebreie
fr: Purées de céleri-rave, Purée de céleri-rave
hr: Pasirani celer
nl: Koolraappureeën

en: Mashed pumpkins
de: Kürbisbreie
fr: Purées de potirons
hr: Pire od bundeve
nl: Pompoenpureeën

en: French bean puree
fr: Purées de haricots verts, Purées d'haricots verts
hr: Pire od graha
nl: Sperziebonenpureeën

en: Green peas puree
fr: Purée de petits pois

en: Mashed vegetables mix
fr: Purée de légumes mélangés